Hawaii statutes.
Laundries,
Cleaners

§507-13 Lien for laundering, cleaning,
dyeing, pressing. Every person to whom there has been or is delivered any
article or lot of articles of wearing apparel or of household use for the
purpose of laundering, cleaning, dyeing, or pressing thereof by such person,
regardless of the process to be employed, shall have a lien thereon for the
amount of all charges incurred for the laundering, cleaning, dyeing, or
pressing thereof. This lien shall be prior to all other rights in or to the
article or lot of articles of which the holder of the lien is without actual
knowledge at the time of delivery thereof to the holder of the lien. [L 1945, c
188, §1; RL 1955, §193-16; HRS §507-13]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next